Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 27

STATE
FUNCTIONS AND RESPONSIBILITIES

Part I. General Provisions

Section

27-1 Functions of statewide concern

27-2 Assignment of functions by governor;
report

27-3 Rights and powers transferred; bond
obligations

27-4 Offenses and penalties not affected; suits
and actions

27-5 Modification to preserve federal aid or
bond

obligations

27-6 Extended state information and services
provided

27-7 Departmental data sharing

Part II. Schools

27-11 Planning, construction, and improvements
of public

school facilities and grounds; custodial
and janitorial

services for public schools;
transportation of school

children

27-12, 13 Repealed

27-14 Transfer of real property

27-15 Repealed

Part III. Health

27-21, 21.1, 21.2, 21.3 Repealed

27-21.4 Transfer of real property

27-21.5 Repealed

27-21.6 Functions reassigned to the counties

27-22, 22.5, 22.7, 23, 24 Repealed

Part IV. Junior Police

27-26 Junior police officer training programs

Part V. Highways; Parks; Historical Sites

27-31 Maintenance of state highways

27-32 Maintenance of state parks

Part VI. Review

27-36 Repealed

Part VII. Technology

27-41 Special advisor for technology development

27-41.1 Definitions

27-42 Repealed

27-43 Information technology; chief information
officer;

information technology steering committee;

establishment; responsibilities

27-43.5 Additional duties of the chief information
officer

relating to security of government
information

27-44 Electronic data set availability; updates

27-44.1 State liability for data sets

27-44.2 Data set licensing

27-44.3 Data set policies and procedures

27-45 Broadband-related permits; automatic
approval

Part VIII. Hawaii Performance Partnerships
Board

27-51 Hawaii performance partnerships board;
establishment

27-52 Duties of the board

27-53 Annual report

27-54 Data collection relating to the well-being
of Hawaii's

children and families

Note

Military presence in Hawaii; memorandum of understanding. L
2012, c 65.

Cross References

Uniform electronic transactions act, see chapter 489E.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next